Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1614
Tax list; consolidated tax; how entered.

All taxes which are uniform, throughout any precinct, township, school district, learning community, village, city, county, or other taxing subdivision of a county, shall be formed into a single tax, be entered upon the tax list in a double column, and be denominated a consolidated tax.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 140, p. 438;

R.S.1913, § 6460;

Laws 1921, c. 158, § 1, p. 649;

C.S.1922, § 5983;

C.S.1929, § 77-1805;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 2, p. 517;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1805;

Laws 1943, c. 175, § 3(1), p. 611;

R.S.1943, § 77-1614;

Laws 1957, c. 334, § 1, p. 1168;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 94;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 6.

As to precincts, taxation is matter of allocation by the supervisor or county clerk, after equalization by the county and state boards of equalization, and after levy has been made by the county board. McDonald v. County of Lincoln, 141 Neb. 741, 4 N.W.2d 903 (1942).